New Jersey, session 222, S3520.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Receipts from sales of recreational safety helmets are exempt from tax imposed under the Sales and Use Tax Act, P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.). b.    As used in this section, recreational safety helmet means any helmet or other protective headgear that: (1) meets the standards prescribed by or pursuant to the laws or regulations requiring operators of bicycles, unicycles, motorcycles, motorized bicycles, motorized scooters, roller skates, and skateboards to wear helmets or headgear; or (2) is designed by a manufacturer to be worn while engaged in the activity of downhill skiing or the operation of a toboggan, sled, snowboard, snowmobile, or similar means of transport over snow-covered terrain. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to sales made on or after the first day of the third month following enactment.